Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201853-505
Nebraska Craft Brewery Board; annual report; contents; fee.

(1) The Nebraska Craft Brewery Board shall publish an annual report on or before January 1 of each year which shall set forth in detail the following:

(a) The name and address of each board member and a copy of all rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the board; and

(b) A detailed explanation of all programs for which the board approved funding during the most recently completed fiscal year pursuant to section 53-504.

(2) Each annual report shall be presented electronically to the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission within thirty days after its publication and made available also to any person who requests a copy. Except for the annual copy required by this section to be provided to the commission, the board may charge a nominal fee to cover the costs of printing and postage for making available copies of its annual reports.

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 5.